src/numeral-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON LÅK-					
låk# AKTAF ;
låk# AVTAS ;								
låk# 2TO9F ;
låge# AKTAF ;
låge# AVTAS ;								
låge# 2TO9F ;								
låhke+Num+Sg+Attr:låk%> K ;    
låhke#+Num+Sg+Attr:låk%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
låhke#+Num+Sg+Gen:låge%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 låhke:låhk  TJUOHTECASE ;  ! vihttalåhke, collective number
låhke+Num+Sg+Ill:låhkå%>j K ; 
låhke+Num+Sg+Nom:låhke%> K ;            
låhke+Num+Ess:låhke%>n K ;                       
lågåt+A+Ord:lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;
låges+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:låges%> K ;
låges+N+Coll:låhkås VIDÁS ;       
		
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-					
låk#akta ẈG-LÅK-AKTA ;
låk#åvtå ẈG-LÅK-ÅVTÅ ;
låk# ẈG-LÅK-2TO9F ;
låge#akta ẈG-LÅK-AKTA ;
låge#åvtå ẈG-LÅK-ÅVTÅ ;								
låge# ẈG-LÅK-2TO9F ;								
låhke+Num+Sg+Attr:låk%> K ;    
låhke#+Num+Sg+Attr:låk%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
låhke#+Num+Sg+Gen:låge%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 låhke:låhk  ẈG-LÅK-TJUOHTECASE ;  ! vihttalåhke, collective number
låhke+Num+Sg+Ill:låhkå%>j K ; 
låhke+Num+Ess:n#låhke%>n K ;    
låhke+Num+Ess:n#låge%>n K ;                                          
låhke+Num+Sg+Com:jn#lågi%>jn K ;                       
låhke+Num+Sg+Ela:t#låge%>s K ;                       
låhke+Num+Sg+Par:låge%>t K ;                       
låhke+Num+Sg+Par:t#låge%>t K ;                       


LEXICON 2TO9LÅG					
guokta# LÅK- ;		
guokte# LÅK- ;	
guok# LÅK- ;
guokta#:guovte# ẈG-LÅK- ;													
gålmmå# LÅK- ;
gålmmå#:gålmå# ẈG-LÅK- ;				
niellja# LÅK- ;	
niellje# LÅK- ;
niellja#:nielja# ẈG-LÅK- ;
niellje#:nielje# ẈG-LÅK- ;
vihtta# LÅK- ;
vihtta#:vidá# ẈG-LÅK- ;				
guhtta# LÅK- ;
guhtta#:gudá# ẈG-LÅK- ;
gietjav# LÅK- ;	
giehtja# LÅK- ;					
gietja# LÅK- ;
gietja# ẈG-LÅK- ;									
gáktsa# LÅK- ;
gáktse# LÅK- ;
gáktsa#:gávtse# ẈG-LÅK- ;					
aktse# LÅK- ;					
aktse#:avtse# ẈG-LÅK- ;

LEXICON TJUOHTE					
tjuohte:tjuoht TJUOHTECASE ;    
tjuohte+Num+Sg+Ill:tjuohtá%>j K ;  
tjuohte+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuohte%> K ;  
tjuohte+Num+Ess:tjuohte%>n K ;  
tjuohte#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuohte%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuohte#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuohte# LÅGEVF ;
tjuohte# LÅK- ;
tjuohte# 2TO9LÅG ;					
tjuohte# AKTAF ;
tjuohte# AVTAS ;										
tjuohte# 2TO9F ;					
tjuohte# LÅGENAN ;				
tjuodát+A+Ord:tjuodád9 VUOSTASJ ;			
akta#tjuohte:akta#tjuoht TJUOHTECASE ;    
akta#tjuohte+Num+Sg+Ill:akta#tjuohtá%>j K ; 
akta#tjuohte+Num+Sg+Nom:akta#tjuohte%> K ;  
akta#tjuohte+Num+Ess:akta#tjuohte%>n K ;   
akta#tjuohte# LÅGEVF ;
akta#tjuohte# LÅK- ;
akta#tjuohte# 2TO9LÅG ;					
akta#tjuohte# AKTAF ;
akta#tjuohte# AVTAS ;										
akta#tjuohte# 2TO9F ;					
akta#tjuohte# LÅGENAN ;				
tjuodes+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:tjuodes%> K ;      
tjuodes+N+Coll:tjuohtás VIDÁS ;       
akta#tjuodes+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:akta#tjuodes%> K ;      
akta#tjuodes+N+Coll:akta#tjuohtás VIDÁS ;       




LEXICON 2TO9TJUO					
guokta# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;			
guokte# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;	
guok# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;													
gålmmå# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;					
niellja# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;				
niellje# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;				
vihtta# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;					
guhtta# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;					
gietjav# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;
giehtja# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;					
gietja# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;										
gáktsa# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;			
gáktse# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;							
aktse# GTJUODE-SPLIT ;	
guokta#:guovte# WG-GTJUODE ;	
gålmmå#:gålmå# WG-GTJUODE ;					
niellja#:nielja# WG-GTJUODE ;				
niellje#:nielje# WG-GTJUODE ;				
vihtta#:vidá# WG-GTJUODE ;					
guhtta#:gudá# WG-GTJUODE ;					
gietja# WG-GTJUODE ;
gáktsa#:gávtse# WG-GTJUODE ;							
aktse#:avtse# WG-GTJUODE ;	

LEXICON	GTJUODE-SPLIT
 GTJUODE ;
 TJUOHTEIMPRECISE ;			

  
LEXICON GTJUODE					
tjuode#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuode%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuohte#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuohte%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuohte#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuode LÅGEVF ;		
tjuohte LÅGEVF ;					
tjuot LÅGEVF ;								
tjuode# 2TO9LÅG ;
tjuohte# 2TO9LÅG ;					
tjuot# 2TO9LÅG ;										
tjuode# AKTAF ;	
tjuohte# AKTAF ;	
tjuot# AKTAF ;
tjuode# AVTAS ;		
tjuot# AVTAS ;									
tjuohte# AVTAS ;															
tjuode# 2TO9F ;		
tjuot# 2TO9F ;					
tjuohte# 2TO9F ;			
tjuode# LÅGENAN ;	
tjuot# LÅGENAN ;				
tjuohte# LÅGENAN ;			
!tjuohte:tjuoht TJUOHTECASE ;      ! imprecise number
tjuode:tjuoht TJUOHTECASE ;
tjuode+Num+Sg+Ill:tjuohtá%>j K ;
tjuode+Num+Ess:tjuohte%>n K ;
tjuode+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuot%> K ;
tjuodát+A+Ord:tjuodád9 VUOSTASJ ;			
tjuodes+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:tjuodes%> K ;      
tjuodes+N+Coll:tjuohtás VIDÁS ;       

LEXICON WG-GTJUODE					
tjuode#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuode%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuohte#+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
tjuode:tjuoht ẈG-LÅK-TJUOHTECASE ;
tjuode+Num+Sg+Ill:tjuohtá%>j K ;
tjuode+Num+Ess:n#tjuohte%>n K ;
tjuode+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuot%> K ;
tjuode+Num+Sg+Attr:tjuode%> K ;
tjuode+Num+Sg+Com:jn#tjuodi%>jn K ;                       
tjuode+Num+Sg+Ela:t#tjuode%>s K ;                       
tjuode+Num+Sg+Par:tjuode%>t K ;                       
tjuode+Num+Sg+Par:t#tjuode%>t K ;                       


LEXICON TJUOHTEIMPRECISE
 tjuohte+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuohte%> K ; ! 200-or-so


LEXICON AKTA                
+Num:%> AKTA-NIE ;               
+Num:%>Q1 AKTA-OBL ;              

LEXICON AKTA-NIE                
 +Sg+Nom: K ;               
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;              
 +Ess:n K ;                 

LEXICON AKTA-OBL                
 +Sg+Gen: K ;               
 +Sg+Gen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;              
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;              
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;              
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;               
 +Pl+Nom: K ;                
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;               
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;             
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;              
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;              
 +Pl+Com:j K ;               
 
LEXICON ÅVTÅ                 
+Num+Sg+Gen:%> K ;             
+Num+Sg+Gen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:%>v K ;            
+Num+Sg+Ine:%>n K ;            
+Num+Sg+Ela:%>s K ;            
+Num+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;           
+Num+Sg+Par:%>t K ;            
+Num+Pl+Nom:%> K ;             
+Num+Pl+Gen:%>j K ;            
+Num+Pl+Acc:%>jt K ;           
+Num+Pl+Ill:%>jda K ;          
+Num+Pl+Ine:%>jn K ;           
+Num+Pl+Ela:%>js K ;           
+Num+Pl+Com:%>j K ;

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-ÅVTÅ                 
+Num+Sg+Gen:%> K ;             
+Num+Sg+Gen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:%>v K ;            
+Num+Sg+Ine:%>n K ;            
+Num+Sg+Ela:%>s K ;            
+Num+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;           
+Num+Sg+Par:%>t K ;            
       
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA                
+Num:%> ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-NIE ;               
+Num:%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-OBL ;              

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-NIE                
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;              
 +Ess:n K ;                 

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-OBL                
 +Sg+Gen: K ;               
 +Sg+Gen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;              
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;              
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;              
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;               
 +Pl+Nom: K ;                
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;               
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;             
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;              
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;              
 +Pl+Com:j K ;               

LEXICON GUOKTA                  
+Num:e%>Q1 GUOVTE- ;
+Num+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 K ;              
+Num+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;   
+Num:i%>Q1 GUOVTI- ;               
+Num: GUOKTA- ;                 

LEXICON GUOVTE- 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;            
 +Sg+Gen: K ;   
 +Sg+Gen:%- K ;                         
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;   
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;             
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;             
 +Pl+Nom: K ;              
 
LEXICON GUOVTI-   
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;            
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;             
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;            
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;           
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;            
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;            
 +Pl+Com:j K ;             


LEXICON GUOKTA-            
 +Sg+Nom:a%> K ;       
 +Sg+Nom:e%> K ;               
 +Sg+Acc:a%> K ;           
 +Ess:a%>n K ;   
 +Ess:e%>n K ;             
          

LEXICON LÅGENAN					
lågenan#akta AKTA ;        
lågenan#akta:lågenan#åvtå ÅVTÅ ;		
lågenan#guokta:lågenan#guokt GUOKTA ;
lågenan#niellja:lågenan#niellj GUOKTA ;   
